src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.aff
SET ISO8859-1

TRY aeroinsctldumpbgfvhz  j q  xy  kwAEROINSCTLDUMPBGFVHZ  J Q  XY  KW

REP 20
REP  s az
REP az  s
REP cc x
REP  s ez
REP ez  s
REP g e hue
REP g i hui
REP hue g e
REP hui g i
REP  s iz
REP  o ido
REP ke que
REP ki qui
REP ll y
REP mb nv
REP nv mb
REP seci cesi
REP x cc
REP y ll
REP v monos vay monos

MAP 5
MAP a A 
MAP e E 
MAP i I 
MAP o O 
MAP u  U  
PFX a Y 2
PFX a 0 a [^aeiou]
PFX a 0 an [aeiou]

PFX b Y 1
PFX b 0 ante .

PFX c Y 2
PFX c 0 anti [^r]
PFX c 0 antir r

PFX d Y 2
PFX d 0 auto [^r]
PFX d 0 autor r

PFX e Y 2
PFX e 0 bi [^r]
PFX e 0 bir r

PFX f Y 6
PFX f 0 con [^abehilopru]
PFX f 0 con ll
PFX f 0 com pb
PFX f 0 co [aehiou]
PFX f 0 co l[^l]
PFX f 0 cor r

PFX g Y 3
PFX g 0 de [^er]
PFX g 0 d e
PFX g 0 der r

PFX h Y 2
PFX h 0 des [^s]
PFX h 0 de s

PFX i Y 2
PFX i 0 em [bp]
PFX i 0 en [^bp]

PFX j Y 2
PFX j 0 entre [^r]
PFX j 0 entrer r

PFX k Y 4
PFX k 0 i l
PFX k 0 im [bp]
PFX k 0 in [^blpr]
PFX k 0 ir r

PFX l Y 1
PFX l 0 inter .

PFX m Y 2
PFX m 0 micro [^r]
PFX m 0 micror r

PFX n Y 3
PFX n 0 pr e
PFX n 0 pre [^er]
PFX n 0 prer r

PFX o Y 2
PFX o 0 pro [^r]
PFX o 0 pror r

PFX p Y 2
PFX p 0 r e
PFX p 0 re .

PFX q Y 3
PFX q 0 sem i
PFX q 0 semi [^ir]
PFX q 0 semir r

PFX r Y 3
PFX r 0 sobr e
PFX r 0 sobre [^r]
PFX r 0 sobrer r

PFX s Y 1
PFX s 0 sub .

PFX t Y 1
PFX t 0 super .

PFX u Y 8
PFX u e tran es
PFX u 0 tran s
PFX u 0 trans [^es]
PFX u e trans e[^s]
PFX u e tra es
PFX u 0 tra s
PFX u 0 tras [^es]
PFX u e tras e[^s]

SFX A Y 18
SFX A r ci n ar
SFX A r ciones ar
SFX A er ici n [^cn]er
SFX A er iciones [^cn]er
SFX A er ici n [^e]cer
SFX A er iciones [^e]cer
SFX A ecer ici n ecer
SFX A ecer iciones ecer
SFX A er ici n [^o]ner
SFX A er iciones [^o]ner
SFX A ner sici n oner
SFX A ner siciones oner
SFX A r ci n [^c]ir
SFX A r ciones [^c]ir
SFX A r ci n [^u]cir
SFX A r ciones [^u]cir
SFX A ir ci n ucir
SFX A ir ciones ucir

SFX B Y 6
SFX B r dura [ai ]r
SFX B r duras [ai ]r
SFX B r dura [^s]er
SFX B r duras [^s]er
SFX B er idura ser
SFX B er iduras ser

SFX C Y 14
SFX C r je ar
SFX C r jes ar
SFX C 0 je a
SFX C 0 jes a
SFX C 0 aje [^aei]r
SFX C 0 ajes [^aei]r
SFX C 0 aje l
SFX C 0 ajes l
SFX C e aje e
SFX C e ajes e
SFX C  n onaje  n
SFX C  n onajes  n
SFX C o aje o
SFX C o ajes o

SFX F Y 6
SFX F te cia ante
SFX F te cias ante
SFX F te cia [^i]ente
SFX F te cias [^i]ente
SFX F iente encia iente
SFX F iente encias iente

SFX H Y 14
SFX H 0 zo a
SFX H 0 zos a
SFX H e azo [^u]e
SFX H e azos [^u]e
SFX H que cazo que
SFX H que cazos que
SFX H o azo o
SFX H o azos o
SFX H 0 azo [lr]
SFX H 0 azos [lr]
SFX H  n inazo  n
SFX H  n inazos  n
SFX H  n onazo  n
SFX H  n onazos  n

SFX J Y 2
SFX J le ilidad ble
SFX J le ilidades ble

SFX K Y 26
SFX K o idad [bdmnruvx]o
SFX K o idades [bdmnruvx]o
SFX K zo cedad [^ei]zo
SFX K zo cedades [^ei]zo
SFX K z cidad z
SFX K z cidades z
SFX K zo cidad [ei]zo
SFX K zo cidades [ei]zo
SFX K e icidad le
SFX K e icidades le
SFX K o edad [fhij]o
SFX K o edades [fhij]o
SFX K  o iedad  o
SFX K  o iedades  o
SFX K 0 idad [lr]
SFX K 0 idades [lr]
SFX K e idad [mnru]e
SFX K e idades [mnru]e
SFX K 0 dad [pv]e
SFX K 0 dades [pv]e
SFX K o edad lso
SFX K o edades lso
SFX K o idad [^l]so
SFX K o idades [^l]so
SFX K co quedad co
SFX K co quedades co

SFX L Y 34
SFX L o  a ero
SFX L o  as ero
SFX L o er a [bdhjln pst]o
SFX L o er as [bdhjln pst]o
SFX L o er a [^e]ro
SFX L o er as [^e]ro
SFX L za cer a za
SFX L za cer as za
SFX L zo cer a zo
SFX L zo cer as zo
SFX L z cer a z
SFX L z cer as z
SFX L a  a era
SFX L a  as era
SFX L a er a [djlpsty]a
SFX L a er as [djlpsty]a
SFX L a er a [^e]ra
SFX L a er as [^e]ra
SFX L  o er a  o
SFX L  o er as  o
SFX L 0  a er
SFX L 0  as er
SFX L 0 r a [jr]e
SFX L 0 r as [jr]e
SFX L 0 er a l
SFX L 0 er as l
SFX L  n aner a  n
SFX L  n aner as  n
SFX L  n oner a  n
SFX L  n oner as  n
SFX L co quer a co
SFX L co quer as co
SFX L a uer a ga
SFX L a uer as ga

SFX M Y 40
SFX M zo cez zo
SFX M zo ceces zo
SFX M 0 za [cdlmpr]e
SFX M 0 zas [cdlmpr]e
SFX M o ez [anou]do
SFX M o eces [anou]do
SFX M io ez dio
SFX M io eces dio
SFX M a ez a
SFX M a eces a
SFX M o ez [hsvy]o
SFX M o eces [hsvy]o
SFX M o ez rio
SFX M o eces rio
SFX M o eza [bp]io
SFX M o ezas [bp]io
SFX M 0 z [jt]e
SFX M 0 ces [jt]e
SFX M o ez ojo
SFX M o eces ojo
SFX M o eza [ai]jo
SFX M o ezas [ai]jo
SFX M 0 eza l
SFX M 0 ezas l
SFX M o eza [npr]o
SFX M o ezas [npr]o
SFX M o ez a o
SFX M o eces a o
SFX M o eza [eio] o
SFX M o ezas [eio] o
SFX M o ez [ai]to
SFX M o eces [ai]to
SFX M o eza nto
SFX M o ezas nto
SFX M o eza [aie]sto
SFX M o ezas [^u]sto
SFX M o ez usto
SFX M o eces usto
SFX M o uez go
SFX M o ueces go

SFX N Y 36
SFX N a illa [bdfhjlmnprstv]a
SFX N a illas [bdfhjlmnprstv]a
SFX N o illo [bdhjlmnprstv]o
SFX N o illos [bdhjlmnprstv]o
SFX N 0 cilla ve
SFX N 0 cillas ve
SFX N za cilla za
SFX N za cillas za
SFX N 0 ecilla d
SFX N 0 ecillas d
SFX N  n oncillo  n
SFX N  n ancillo  n
SFX N 0 cillo or
SFX N 0 cillos or
SFX N zo cillo zo
SFX N zo cillos zo
SFX N 0 cillo [djlnu]e
SFX N 0 cillos [djlnu]e
SFX N z cecillo z
SFX N z cecillos z
SFX N 0 ecillo ur
SFX N 0 ecillos ur
SFX N e illo [cpt]e
SFX N e illos [cpt]e
SFX N 0 illo [ls]
SFX N 0 illos [ls]
SFX N 0 illo [^ou]r
SFX N 0 illos [^ou]r
SFX N co quillo co
SFX N co quillos co
SFX N go guillo go
SFX N go guillos go
SFX N ca quilla ca
SFX N ca quillas ca
SFX N ga guilla ga
SFX N ga guillas ga

SFX O Y 18
SFX O ta mo ta
SFX O 0 ismo [dflnr]
SFX O o ismo [^i]co
SFX O o ismo [^o]ico
SFX O ico  smo oico
SFX O a ismo [dt]a
SFX O o  smo eo
SFX O e ismo [jrt]e
SFX O 0 ismo ln
SFX O  n anismo  n
SFX O  n onismo  n
SFX O o smo io
SFX O o ismo [rst]o
SFX O  a ismo  a
SFX O a smo ia
SFX O  s esismo  s
SFX O 0 mo is
SFX O o uismo go

SFX P Y 4
SFX P r miento [ai]r
SFX P r mientos [ai]r
SFX P er imiento er
SFX P er imientos er

SFX Q Y 40
SFX Q ar i n [lnsx]ar
SFX Q ar iones [lnsx]ar
SFX Q r i n [np]ir
SFX Q r iones [np]ir
SFX Q ar  n iar
SFX Q ar ones iar
SFX Q der si n der
SFX Q der siones der
SFX Q tir si n tir
SFX Q tir siones tir
SFX Q dir si n dir
SFX Q dir siones dir
SFX Q jar si n rjar
SFX Q jar siones rjar
SFX Q dar si n dar
SFX Q dar siones dar
SFX Q onar  n onar
SFX Q ar es onar
SFX Q decer si n decer
SFX Q decer siones decer
SFX Q ir si n uir
SFX Q ir siones uir
SFX Q ndir si n ndir
SFX Q ndir siones ndir
SFX Q er si n [eo]er
SFX Q er siones [eo]er
SFX Q tar si n otar
SFX Q tar siones otar
SFX Q gir si n gir
SFX Q gir siones gir
SFX Q cer si n rcer
SFX Q cer siones rcer
SFX Q rir sti n rir
SFX Q rir stiones rir
SFX Q ctar xi n ctar
SFX Q ctar xiones ctar
SFX Q car xi n car
SFX Q car xiones car
SFX Q jar xi n ejar
SFX Q jar xiones ejar
