src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
abunde/rGSt
acoplar/hRPDE
acuartelen/h
afeminar/RDPAE
aguzar/REBPD
ahechar/RDBE
aligue/fS
alimentamos/r
aliment is/r
ali a/h
amarilla/M
andamio/SC
ando/th
anexar/RQD    E
anteponer/A  
anual/KS
aova/N
apabullar/REPD   
apego/hGS
aplicable/JS
arabio/OS
arborecer/RILD
arborescente/FS
arguya/p
arla/t
arrendataria/s
ascender/RLQID    
asen/trh
asimos/h
atildar/PB
azada/NHS
bala/CH
balas/c
bandolero/SGO
barb /h
barr amos/r
be/CH
bellote/NGS
biten/pa
bobada/aSi
bodoque/HS
bordee/GpS
broncear/RDBE
bulla/C
buses/da
calan/ipl
cal /ilp
calibrar/AR ED
callantar/aRDE
cambiarme/l
canciller/LS
canela/N
cantaba/iSgh
canto/NLSH
carga/rhiSp
carguen/hpr
caro/MS
carro a/i
cart n/CS
casual/OKS
cavo/npji
ceda/boalfn
cedi /blnof
centro/ifh
ce  a/hSp
cernido/N
cernir/BRD
cerrarlo/iSjG
cesare/O
ces /o
chicharran/a
chirriar/DRQI
cho/eGf
cil ndrico/qSG
cipo/cS
circunferencia/qS
cito/pfk
civilmente/k
ciza ar/iRDE
clar n/HS
clarividente/SF
cocos/m
codifica/gh
coged/bprajhi
coger n/ihjbr
cogerse/rbjhi
cog an/rjbih
cogiendo/jbr
cogiere/riSGhbj
cogieseis/brj
coj is/hrjbi
colectad/p
colectores/s
coligar/PAB
color/eS
cometo/aL
comunismo/cS
conceb a/nS
conceptuar /h
conejar/SQ
congraciar/RPE  
conmensurable/kJS
conoced/pnh
constitucional/ckS
contado/pS
continente/kFS
controvertible/Sk
convencional/OS
convento/SN
copada/q
copista/Sd
corcho/hia
correa/HC
cortados/j
cortas/jS
creareis/o
creci semos/r
cresta/hSi
crib is/uh
cristiano/cGS
cubri /pih
cueros/p
c es/c
culebra/NHS
culto/kGSq
curarte/o
curvo/KS
datan/b
decento/aG
decir/jXplfhn
dec s/plnfhj
declamar/A
decorosa/k
delegamos/s
delegaron/s
denomin /d
dente/eS
depresivo/cSG
descarar/RPED
descendi /f
desellar/RB
desmadejar/REDP
despear/RPBD
destinad/n
determinado/kdSG
dicho/bSGphfjnlr
difidente/SF
difunto/qGS
dilatable/JS
dir s/jlnfph
disertar/RDEA
dispersar/QDR     E
distingu s/s
dobla/MCN
doble/qSjpih
docilidad/kS
dolo/CSL
dominan/n
dopa/C
doras/hSrp
electoral/SO
elocuente/FS
embellecer/RLDPI   
eminente/SFt
emite/uSG
emplastar/RBDPE
emplazad/p
encarcelan/h
encarnecer/RIDL
encorvar/BP
engargantar/REBD
enquistan/e
enrigidecer/RILD
ente/qgS
entiende/trhs
entrecoma/N
entrenar s/h
envalentonar/RDEP
equipa/C
erogan/g
escoger/RgLED
escriben/n
escribiere/uGSn
escrib s/ung
es/eS
eslabonan/gh
esmeril/HSG
espasm dico/GcS
espernancad/g
espolear/DRBE  
esquiva/M
estime/GhSs
eterno/GKS
exaltar/ERAP   D
excitable/JS
extrudir/REDQ
exuberante/FS
faradio/Sm
febrero/N
feder /f
fiero/foGlnukpg
figuren/nfuph
figuro/unhfp
file/iSGha
filibustero/SO
filmaba/mS
film is/m
film ndose/m
filmar /m
filmar s/m
filmaremos/m
filmar ais/m
filmaron/m
filmaste/m
finales/q
firm /fpak
flore /u
fluye/apkf
fo/C
form /ufhkpg
fraude/gS
friega/up
funden/ufkipo
fundo/kifoup
gal/GSNL
gases/pj
generoso/KGS
germanizar/RDAE
gestiono/f
giganta/M
gr fica/m
gramatical/acS
gravarlo/GSa
gru  is/i
guarra/HN
hable/GSJ
hato/LSN
hil /hirap
hombre/oStq
hormiguear/RDEP
humanitario/GOS
humeral/tS
iglesia/bS
iludir/Q
imponed/h
imprescriptible/J
indispensable/J
indulgente/FS
informo/K
ingeniero/LSG
inmediata/M
intangible/J
intrincar/RA
irreductible/J
jamba/CS
jeta/H
juramos/f
justificada/k
juvenec a/p
juzga/n
lactante/FS
lambicar/a
laminar /i
lastimar/REDB  
lateral/eSf
latifundio/OS
lenta/N
levo/Gps
lind /haf
lineal/KS
linear/aRjDglE
llanos/pc
luce/upShjni
lucida/M
lunar/sSqa
lustr /hak
mandaros/g
man /hoap
mano/hperabo
marisco/LGS
marr n/HS
maticen/d
mediar /pjog
medi is/pjog
medi /ojlgp
mediten/n
mema/M
meridiana/b
metieron/j
migra/uk
mita/lup
mixtificar/RAED
moda/O
modorran/a
montan/puahi
mont remos/u
mortal/SkK
mostrar s/gn
motor/eGoSd
moviliza/kh
muebla/C
mueva/foap
mullen/ph
mutaci n/uSf
nares/jle
notar/RngfaED
note/nGSgfa
nuncios/la
nupcial/Sb
oleaginoso/KSG
omitir/RQ DE
omnipotente/SF
orden/sh
orfebre/LS
orza/aS
oxidante/cSh
oyerais/j
pagarla/o
palma/N
palote/SH
parlamentario/clSG
parlamentar/RODE
partido/kSg
pas ndola/r
pasa/ohpr
pasible/kJS
pelagiano/qGS
pele/lGSapkij
pendan/okg
peque a/M
percho/i
persona/NC
piar/RQDI
pilen/iga
pina/opi
pintar /rhp
pistolete/SH
plastecer/iRLID
plausible/JS
polarizar/RAE D
poned/ukgptalonbr
ponerme/koprl
ponga/ukgptalonbr
pon a/urbnolatkgp
poni ndoos/rk
port /uapgk
p sito/oSnga
posterior/KS
preciosa/q
preexistente/SF
prend an/ilhg
prensar/RQ  DBE
proporciono/h
psiquis/O
pudibundo/GMS
pugna/kpo
purramos/i
puse/ouagpltrknb
puso/ouagpltrknb
quilla/rS
racionar/REDP
rallar/BRD E
raspada/gS
rate /o
rebelar/RQD E 
recat n/GH
receptivo/GSK
regula/d
regul /d
reja/N
reluctante/SF
remes/e
repulsar/Q
reputar/READ
reum tica/c
revocable/kJS
rijan/f
rite/kgG
roda/NSC
rog ndole/lS
sabihondo/MGS
sachar/RDBE
salm /ig
salten/rap
sambenite/GSi
san /rsp
saya/ie
s /ep
segura/kaS
sellara/pg
seque/pge
servador/fn
servil/SO
sifil tico/GSc
siguiera/ops
sinti /apnf
socio/KSG
solida/M
substancia/g
suelo/sSfj
sugestionad/dG
sugestionar /d
sugestionareis/d
sugestionaron/d
sugestionasteis/d
sugestion /d
superable/Sk
suplente/FS
surcos/ejm
tamboril/SH
tango/eS
tap n/GSHL
taren/hepf
tas/Sepa
tended/sfian
tendiendo/snf
tensar/kRQDE
test /kigaof
tiendan/fas
tonada/N
t nico/oGS
toxican/ka
tradujimos/p
tra do/pafGSg
transparentes/q
traslumbrar/RDPE
traste/HS
tundi /pf
valorar/RtaDhE
vanguardia/SO
vanilocuente/SF
vaporizar/ARED
variable/kJS
var an/hj
ved/bpjn
vela/CN
ven a/fatsrlgpno
ventear/RBDE
verriondo/MGS
vertiste/fks
vino/noltirafgps
vinoso/SGK
vista/nikrpahjo
vitan/k
vivencia/tf
